Maryland, session 2026, SB0812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(14) (i) “Total real property tax” means the product of the sum of all
property tax rates on real property, including special district tax rates, for the taxable year
on a dwelling, multiplied by the lesser of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0812*

SENATE BILL 812
1. $300,000; or
2. the assessed value of the dwelling reduced by the amount
of any assessment on which a property tax credit is granted under § 9–105 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Total real property tax” does not include any adjustment for any
other property tax credit under this title claimed against the property tax imposed on the
dwelling.
(f) A homeowner who meets the requirements of this section shall be granted the
property tax credit under this section against the property tax imposed on the real property
of the dwelling.
(g) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the property tax
credit under this section is the total real property tax of a dwelling, less the percentage of
the combined income of the homeowner that is described in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) The percentage is:
(i) 0% of the 1st [$8,000] $15,000 of combined income;
(ii) [4%] 3% of the next [$4,000] $7,500 of combined income;
(iii) [6.5%] 6% of the next [$4,000] $7,500 of combined income; and
(iv) 9% of the combined income over [$16,000] $30,000.
(j) (1) A property tax credit under this section may not be granted to a
homeowner whose combined net worth exceeds $200,000 as of December 31 of the calendar
year that precedes the year in which the homeowner applies for the property tax credit or
whose combined gross income exceeds [$60,000] $100,000 in that same calendar year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.